Utah statutes.
23-19-22.   Big game hunting permit.

(1)  A person who is at least 12 years old, upon paying the big game hunting permit fee established by the Wildlife Board and possessing a valid hunting or combination license, may apply for or obtain a permit to hunt big game as provided by rules and proclamations of the Wildlife Board.

(2) (a)  A person who is 11 years old may apply for or obtain a big game hunting permit consistent with the requirements of Subsection (1) if that person's 12th birthday falls within the calendar year for which the permit is issued.

(b)  A person may not use a permit to hunt big game before the person's 12th birthday.

(3) (a)  Except as provided by Subsection (3)(b), a person who is younger than 14 years old may not apply for or obtain the following types of big game permits issued by the division through a public drawing:

(i)  premium limited entry;

(ii)  limited entry;

(iii)  once-in-a-lifetime; and

(iv)  cooperative wildlife management unit.

(b)  A person who is 13 years old may obtain a type of permit listed in Subsection (3)(a) if that person's 14th birthday falls within the calendar year for which the permit is issued.

(4)  One dollar of each big game permit fee collected from a resident shall be used for the hunter education program as provided in Section 23-19-17.

